Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 15

Criminal Background Checks

21-15-101. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Applicant” means a person applying for employment with a state agency;

“Central registry check” means a review of the databases of the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry, and the Certified Nursing Assistant/Employment Clearance Registry maintained by the Office of Long-Term Care pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 483.156 and § 20-10-203;

“Child” means a minor under eighteen (18) years of age;

“Criminal history check” means a criminal history report produced by the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police;

“Designated financial or information technology position” means a position designated by a director of a division or office within the Department of Human Services in which the person placed in the position:

Has the authority or capability via computer access or otherwise to receive payments or to issue, initiate, or approve a contract, grant, warrant, payment, or procurement in any form;

Approves security access to information systems;

Authenticates and configures user security access to information systems;

Acts in the capacity of information technology network, application, or system administrator;

Manages or directs information technology network, application, or system administrators; or

Develops, designs, programs, or maintains information technology networks, applications, or systems;

“Designated position” means a position in which a person is employed by or contracting with a contractor of a state agency or a state agency to provide care, supervision, treatment, or any other services to the elderly, to mentally ill or developmentally disabled persons, to persons with mental illnesses, or to children who reside in any state-operated facility or a position in which the applicant, contractor, subcontractor, or employee will have direct contact with a child or a person who is elderly, mentally ill, or developmentally disabled;

“Individual with an intellectual or developmental disability” means a person with a disability that is attributable to:

Impairment of general intellectual functioning or adaptive behavior, including without limitation cerebral palsy, spina bifida, Down syndrome, epilepsy, or autism;

Dyslexia resulting from a disability associated with intellectual and developmental disabilities, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, or autism; or

Any other condition found to be closely related to intellectual and developmental disabilities as described in subdivision (7)(A) of this section because it results in an impairment of general intellectual functioning or adaptive behavior similar to those of persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities or requires treatment and services similar to those required for persons with intellectual and developmental disabilities;

“Direct contact” means the ability to interview, question, examine, interact with, talk with, or communicate with a child without being in the physical presence of a person other than the child;

“Elderly” means persons sixty-five (65) years of age or older;

“Mentally ill persons” means persons who suffer from a substantial impairment of emotional processes, or of the ability to exercise conscious control of their actions, or of the ability to perceive reality or to reason when the impairment is manifested in instances of extremely abnormal behavior or extremely faulty perceptions.

“Mentally ill persons” does not include persons whose impairment is solely caused by epilepsy, continuous or noncontinuous periods of intoxication caused by substances such as alcohol or drugs, or dependence upon or addiction to any substance such as alcohol or drugs; and

“State agency” means any agency, authority, board, bureau, commission, council, department, office, or officer of the state receiving an appropriation by the General Assembly.

“State agency” does not include municipalities, townships, counties, school districts, and state-supported institutions of higher education.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment added (1), (3) and (5) and redesignated former (1), (2), and (3) as present (2), (4), and (6), respectively; and deleted “and” at the end of (4).

The 2001 amendment inserted (2), (5), and (8), and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; in present (4), substituted “mentally ill or developmentally disabled persons” for “individuals with mental or physical disabilities”, and deleted a comma following “facility”; and added subdivision designations in present (9).

The 2005 amendment substituted “and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment” for “Abuse” in (2); and inserted present (4) and (6) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly.

The 2011 amendment inserted “spina bifida, Down syndrome” in (7)(A).

The 2019 amendment by No. 318, in (6), inserted “or contracting with a contractor of a state agency or” and inserted “contractor, subcontractor”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 1035 rewrote (7).

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 1; 1999, No. 1409, § 9; 2001, No. 995, § 1; 2005, No. 1422, § 1; 2007, No. 991, § 1; 2011, No. 68, § 4; 2019, No. 318, § 10; 2019, No. 1035, § 49.

21-15-102. Positions involving direct contact with children and with mentally ill and developmentally disabled persons.

When a person applies for employment with a state agency in a designated position and if the state agency intends to make an offer of employment to the applicant, the applicant shall complete a criminal history check form and a central registry check form obtained from the state agency and shall submit the form to the state agency as part of the application process.

If the state agency intends to make an offer of employment to the applicant, the state agency within five (5) days of the decision shall:

(a)Use the Online Criminal Background Check System to obtain the criminal history or forward the criminal history check form to the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police and request the bureau to review the bureau's database of criminal history.

Within three (3) days of the receipt of a request to review the database, the bureau shall notify the state agency if the database contains any criminal history records on the applicant; and

Within seven (7) days of the receipt of a request for a central registry check, the central registry shall notify the state agency if the database contains any information naming the applicant as an offender or perpetrator of child or adult abuse.

When a national criminal history check is required under this section, the criminal history check shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

Before making a temporary or permanent offer of employment in a designated position, a state agency shall inform applicants that:

Continued employment is contingent upon the results of a criminal history check and a central registry check; and

The applicant has the right to obtain a copy of his or her:

Criminal history report from the bureau; and

Central registry report from the registries.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section, no person shall be eligible for employment with a state agency in a designated position if that person has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, any of the following offenses by any court in the State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or of any similar offense by a federal court unless the conviction was vacated or reversed:

Capital murder, as prohibited in § 5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree and second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-10-102 and 5-10-103;

Manslaughter, as prohibited in § 5-10-104;

Negligent homicide, as prohibited in § 5-10-105;

Kidnapping, as prohibited in § 5-11-102;

False imprisonment in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-11-103;

Permanent detention or restraint, as prohibited in § 5-11-106;

Robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-102;

Aggravated robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-103;

Battery in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-13-201;

Aggravated assault, as prohibited in § 5-13-204;

Introduction of controlled substance into body of another person, as prohibited in § 5-13-210;

Terroristic threatening in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-13-301;

Rape, as prohibited in § 5-14-103;

Sexual indecency with a child, as prohibited in § 5-14-110;

Sexual assault in the first degree, second degree, third degree, and fourth degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-14-124 — 5-14-127;

Incest, as prohibited in § 5-26-202;

Offenses against the family, as prohibited in §§ 5-26-303 — 5-26-306;

Endangering the welfare of an incompetent person in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-201;

Endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-205;

Permitting abuse of a minor, as prohibited in § 5-27-221;

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, pandering, or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, or the use of a child or consent to the use of a child in a sexual performance by producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, as prohibited in §§ 5-27-303 — 5-27-305, 5-27-402, and 5-27-403;

Adult abuse that constitutes a felony, as prohibited in § 5-28-103;

Theft of property, as prohibited in § 5-36-103;

Theft by receiving, as prohibited in § 5-36-106;

Arson, as prohibited in § 5-38-301;

Burglary, as prohibited in § 5-39-201;

Felony violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act,§§5-64-101 — 5-64-508, as prohibited in the former § 5-64-401 and §§5-64-419 — 5-64-442;

Promotion of prostitution in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-70-104;

Stalking, as prohibited in § 5-71-229;

Computer child pornography, as prohibited in § 5-27-603;

Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-605;

Criminal attempt, criminal complicity, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy, as prohibited in §§ 5-3-201, 5-3-202, 5-3-301, and 5-3-401, to commit any of the offenses listed in this subsection;

Theft of public benefits, as prohibited in § 5-36-202;

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony; or

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113.

For purposes of this section, an expunged record of a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense listed in subsection (f) of this section shall not be considered a conviction or a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the offense unless the offense is also listed in subdivision (g)(2) of this section.

Because of the serious nature of the following offenses and the close relationship between the following offenses and the type of work that is to be performed by the applicant, a conviction of one (1) or more of the following offenses by an applicant shall result in permanent disqualification from employment in a designated position:

Capital murder, as prohibited in § 5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree and murder in the second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-10-102 and 5-10-103;

Kidnapping, as prohibited in § 5-11-102;

Rape, as prohibited in § 5-14-103;

Sexual assault in the first degree and second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-14-124 and 5-14-125;

Endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree and endangering the welfare of a minor in the second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-27-205 and 5-27-206;

Incest, as prohibited in § 5-26-202;

Arson, as prohibited in § 5-38-301;

Endangering the welfare of an incompetent person in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-201;

Adult abuse that constitutes a felony, as prohibited in § 5-28-103;

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony; or

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent. The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment, in (a), designated in former introductory paragraph as (a)(1); redesignated former (a)(1) and (a)(2) as present (a)(2) and (a)(3), respectively; in (a)(1), substituted “designated position” for “position that includes, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child” in the first sentence and substituted “in designated positions” for “having direct contact with a child” at the end of the second sentence.

The 2001 amendment by No. 995 rewrote this section.

The 2001 amendment by No. 1553 inserted “The state agency … of the applicant” in (a)(1), and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendment by No. 1087 added (f)(32) and (33).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1380 rewrote (f)(14); inserted present (f)(15) and (16); deleted former (f)(15)-(17) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and made stylistic changes.

The 2003 amendment by No. 1473 inserted “check” in (e)(1); and rewrote (e)(2).

The 2005 amendment deleted “checks on state agency employees in designated positions” from the end of (a)(1)(B)(i)(a) ; substituted “and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment” for “Abuse” in (a)(1)(B)(ii)(a) and (a)(4); inserted “in a designated position” in (e); in (f), inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (g)(2) of this section” and “unless the conviction was vacated or reversed”; and added (g).

The 2011 amendment, in (f)(28), inserted “the former” and “and §§5-64-419 —5-64-442”.

The 2013 amendment substituted “seven (7) days” for “three (3) days” in (a)(1)(B)(ii)(c) ; and added (f)(34).

The 2017 amendment by No. 367 added (f)(35) and (g)(2)(K).

The 2017 amendment by No. 664 added (f)(36) and (g)(2)(L).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Background Checks, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 471, 472, 475.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Criminal Law, Computer Crimes, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 361.

(1)A state agency shall ensure that any incumbent employee in a designated position has a subsequent criminal background check completed within five (5) years of the incumbent employee’s initial criminal background check and every five (5) years thereafter.

In accordance with subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) of this section, each employee of a state agency in a designated position shall complete a criminal history check form and a central registry check form obtained from the state agency and shall submit the form to the state agency. The state agency shall:

Use the Online Criminal Background Check System to obtain a criminal history check or forward the criminal history check form to the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police.

The state agency shall pay any fee associated with the criminal history check on behalf of the employee; and

Forward the central registry check to the Child Maltreatment Central Registry and the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry for a review of the registry databases.

The state agency shall pay any fee associated with the central registry checks.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the bureau shall conduct a state criminal history check and a national criminal history check on an applicant upon receiving a criminal history check request from a state agency.

(1)Upon completion of a criminal history check on an employee, the bureau shall issue a report to the state agency.

If the state agency determines that an employee is disqualified from employment, then the state agency shall discharge the employee.

When a national criminal history check is required under this section, the criminal history check shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

If a waiver applicant has been named as an offender or perpetrator in a true, substantiated, or founded report from the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry, or the Certified Nursing Assistant/Employment Clearance Registry, the state agency shall discharge the employee.

A state agency shall inform all employees in designated positions that:

Criminal history report from the bureau; and

Central registry report from the registries.

Except as provided in subdivision (h)(1) of this section, a state agency shall discharge from employment in a designated position any person who has pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of, any of the following offenses by any court in the State of Arkansas or of any similar offense by a court in another state or of any similar offense by a federal court unless the conviction was vacated or reversed:

Negligent homicide, as prohibited in § 5-10-105;

Kidnapping, as prohibited in § 5-11-102;

False imprisonment in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-11-103;

Permanent detention or restraint, as prohibited in § 5-11-106;

Robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-102;

Aggravated robbery, as prohibited in § 5-12-103;

Battery in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-13-201;

Aggravated assault, as prohibited in § 5-13-204;

Introduction of controlled substance into body of another person, as prohibited in § 5-13-210;

Terroristic threatening in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-13-301;

Rape, as prohibited in § 5-14-103;

Sexual indecency with a child, as prohibited in § 5-14-110;

Sexual assault in the first degree, second degree, third degree, or fourth degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-14-124 — 5-14-127;

Incest, as prohibited in § 5-26-202;

Offenses against the family, as prohibited in §§ 5-26-303 — 5-26-306;

Endangering the welfare of an incompetent person in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-201;

Endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-205;

Permitting abuse of a minor, as prohibited in § 5-27-221 ;

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, pandering, or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, or the use of a child or consent to the use of a child in a sexual performance by producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, as prohibited in §§ 5-27-303 — 5-27-305, 5-27-402, and 5-27-403;

Adult abuse constituting a felony, as prohibited in § 5-28-103;

Theft of property, as prohibited in § 5-36-103;

Theft by receiving, as prohibited in § 5-36-106;

Arson, as prohibited in § 5-38-301;

Burglary, as prohibited in § 5-39-201;

Felony violation of the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, §§5-64-101 — 5-64-508, as prohibited in the former § 5-64-401 and §§5-64-419 — 5-64-442;

Promotion of prostitution in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-70-104;

Stalking, as prohibited in § 5-71-229;

Computer child pornography, as prohibited in § 5-27-603;

Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-605;

Criminal attempt, criminal complicity, criminal solicitation, or criminal conspiracy, as prohibited in §§ 5-3-201, 5-3-202, 5-3-301, and 5-3-401, to commit any of the offenses listed in this subsection;

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony; or

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113.

For purposes of this section, an expunged record of a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to an offense listed in subsection (g) of this section shall not be considered a conviction or plea of guilty or nolo contendere to the offense unless the offense is also listed in subdivision (h)(2) of this section.

Because of the serious nature of the offenses and the close relationship to the type of work that is to be performed, the following offenses shall result in permanent disqualification:

Capital murder, as prohibited in § 5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree and murder in the second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-10-102 and 5-10-103;

Kidnapping, as prohibited in § 5-11-102;

Rape, as prohibited in § 5-14-103;

Sexual assault in the first degree and second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-14-124 and 5-14-125;

Endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree and endangering the welfare of a minor in the second degree, as prohibited in §§ 5-27-205 and 5-27-206;

Incest, as prohibited in § 5-26-202;

Arson, as prohibited in § 5-38-301;

Endangering the welfare of an incompetent person in the first degree, as prohibited in § 5-27-201;

Adult abuse that constitutes a felony, as prohibited in § 5-28-103;

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony; and

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2011, No. 570, § 1, provided:

“Legislative intent.

The intent of this act is to implement comprehensive measures designed to reduce recidivism, hold offenders accountable, and contain correction costs.”

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “designated positions will” for “positions that include, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child” in (a)(1); substituted “designated position” for “position that includes, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child” in (a)(2) and (b)(2); in the introductory paragraph of (f), substituted “designated position” for “position that includes, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child or children” and inserted “federal”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment inserted (a)(2), and redesignated former (a)(2) as (a)(3); added the subdivision designations in present (a)(3); in the introductory language of (a)(3), substituted “subdivisions (a)(1) and (2)” for “subdivision (a)(1)” and inserted “and a central registry check form”; added (a)(3)(B); added the subdivision designations in (c); in (c)(2)(A), substituted “(g)” for “(f)” and deleted “and” from the end; inserted (e) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; added the subdivision designations in present (f); deleted comma following “child” in introductory language of (f); deleted “that” from beginning of (f)(2); added “and” to (f)(2)(A); added (f)(2)(B); substituted “abuse of a child” for “child abuse” in (g)(22); and substituted “medium” for “media” in (g)(23).

The 2003 amendment by No. 482 substituted “in designated positions that” for “in positions that include, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child that” in the introductory language in (f).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1087 added (g)(32) and (33).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1379 rewrote (g)(14); inserted present (g)(15) and (16); deleted former (g)(15)-(17) and redesignated the remaining subdivisions accordingly; and made stylistic changes throughout (g).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1473 inserted “and a central registry check” in (f)(1); and rewrote (f)(2).

The 2005 amendment by No. 1422 rewrote (a)(1)(B) and the last sentence in (a)(2); substituted “and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment” for “Abuse” in (a)(3)(B)(i) and (e); substituted “If a waiver” for “If an” in (e); in (g), inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (h)(1) of this section” and substituted “unless the conviction was vacated or reversed” for “but only after an opportunity for a hearing conducted in accordance with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, §25-15-201 et seq.”; and added (a)(2)(B) and (h).

The 2005 amendment by No. 1923 inserted “Except as provided in subdivision (h)(1) of this section” in (g); and added (h).

The 2011 amendment, in (g)(28), inserted “the former” and “and §§5-64-419 —5-64-442”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 367 added (g)(34) and (h)(2)(K).

The 2017 amendment by No. 664 added (g)(35) and (h)(2)(L).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Discharge of Convicted Employee, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 473.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Background Checks, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 471, 472, 475.

(1)The provisions of § 21-15-102(a)(4) and §§ 21-15-102(f), 21-15-103(e), 21-15-103(g), and 21-15-110(b) may be waived by the director of a state agency upon the request of:

A supervisor or other managerial employee in the state agency;

An affected applicant; or

An incumbent employee in a designated position who is subject to discharge.

A request for a waiver must be made within five (5) days of receipt of the criminal background check or central registry check.

If the crime is a misdemeanor and more than five (5) years have elapsed since the conviction, the state agency is not required to discharge an incumbent employee if a request for a waiver is timely made and if the waiver is ultimately granted.

If the waiver is not granted and the request was for an incumbent employee who was not immediately discharged, the state agency shall immediately discharge the incumbent employee.

If the waiver is not granted and the request was for an applicant, the state agency is prohibited from hiring the applicant.

If an incumbent employee was immediately discharged but was subsequently granted a waiver, the incumbent employee shall be immediately reinstated but is not entitled to retroactive relief, including back pay.

The age at which the crime or act was committed;

The circumstances surrounding the crime or act;

The length of time since the crime or act;

Subsequent work history;

Employment references;

Character references; and

Other evidence demonstrating that the applicant or employee does not pose a threat to the health or safety of children or other clients of the state agency.

Because of the serious nature of the offenses and the close relationship to the type of work that is to be performed, the following offenses may not be waived by the director of a state agency:

Sexual assault in the second degree, § 5-14-125;

Sexual indecency with a child, § 5-14-110;

Endangering the welfare of an incompetent person in the first degree, § 5-27-201;

Endangering the welfare of a minor in the first degree, § 5-27-205;

Engaging children in sexually explicit conduct for use in visual or print medium, § 5-27-303;

Pandering or possessing visual or print medium depicting sexually explicit conduct involving a child, § 5-27-304;

Transportation of minors for prohibited sexual conduct, § 5-27-305;

Employing or consenting to the use of a child in a sexual performance, § 5-27-402;

Producing, directing, or promoting a sexual performance by a child, § 5-27-403;

Adult abuse that constitutes a felony, § 5-28-103;

Arson, § 5-38-301;

Computer child pornography, § 5-27-603;

Computer exploitation of a child in the first degree, § 5-27-605;

Aggravated assault upon a law enforcement officer or an employee of a correctional facility, § 5-13-211, if a Class Y felony; and

Sexual extortion, § 5-14-113.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment added “or other clients of the state agency” at the end of (b)(7); added (c); and made stylistic changes.

The 2001 amendment substituted “21-15-102(a)(4), 21-15-103(f), 21-15-103(e), 21-15-103(g), and 21-15-110(b)” for “21-15-102(f) and 21-15-103(f)” in the introductory language of (a); and inserted “or act” in (b)(1), (2), and (3) in (b).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1087 added (c)(12) and (13).

The 2003 amendment by No. 1377 rewrote (c)(4) and (5); substituted “indecency with a child” for “solicitation of a child” in (c)(6); and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a) and (a)(1)-(3) as present (a)(1) and (a)(1)(A)-(C); added present (a)(2)-(6) and (b)(1); redesignated former (b) and (b)(1)-(7) as present (b)(2) and (b)(2)(A)-(G); and rewrote present (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment by No. 367 added (c)(20).

The 2017 amendment by No. 664 added (c)(21).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Background Checks, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 471, 472, 475.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a), inserted “or from a central registry check”, and inserted “or her.”

The 2015 amendment, in (a), substituted “under” for “pursuant to” and deleted “except by the affected applicant for employment or his or her authorized representative” following “available for examination”.

Amendments. The 1999 amendment substituted “designated position” for “position that includes, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child” in (a).

The 2001 amendment, in (b), inserted the comma following “Center,” deleted “or” following “Center,” and inserted “or the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, the Adult Abuse Central Registry, or the Certified Nursing Assistant/Employment Clearance Registry” and “central registry.”

The 2005 amendment inserted “or a designated financial or information technology position” in (a); and, in (b), substituted “and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment” for “Abuse” and inserted “and” following “criminal history.”

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a).

Amendments. The 2001 amendment substituted “Identification Bureau of the Department Arkansas State Police the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, the Adult Abuse Central Registry, and the Certified Nursing Assistant/Employment Clearance Registry” for “bureau” in the section heading; and added (a)(2), (b)(2) and (d)(2).

The 2003 amendment substituted “in a designated position” for “in a position that includes, as part of the job description, direct contact with a child or children” in (c).

The 2005 amendment substituted “and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment” for “Abuse” in (d)(2).

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Survey of Legislation, 2003 Arkansas General Assembly, Public Officers and Employees, Background Checks, 26 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 471, 472, 475.

(a)Forward the central registry check form to the Child Maltreatment Central Registry and the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry for a central registry check.

The state agency shall pay any fee associated with the central registry check on behalf of the applicant.

If no criminal history or central registry records regarding the applicant are found in the database, then the state agency may make an offer of temporary employment to the applicant while the bureau completes a criminal history check and the state agency determines whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

(A)If a criminal history record regarding the applicant is found in the bureau's database, then the applicant is temporarily disqualified from employment until the state agency determines whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

If the state agency determines that the applicant is not disqualified, then the state agency may continue to temporarily employ the applicant while the bureau completes a criminal history check.

If an applicant has been named as an offender or perpetrator in a true, substantiated, or founded report from the Child Maltreatment Central Registry or the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry, the applicant shall be immediately disqualified.

(1)Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the bureau shall conduct a state criminal history check and a national criminal history check on an applicant upon receiving a criminal history check request from a state agency.

(A)If the state agency can verify that the applicant has lived continuously in the State of Arkansas for the past five (5) years, the bureau shall conduct only a state criminal history check on the applicant.

If the state agency can verify that the selected applicant currently works for a state agency in a designated position or a designated financial or information technology position and the state agency can provide verification that a criminal history check for that position has been completed in the last five (5) years, the state agency does not need to conduct another criminal history check on the employee until the criminal history check is five (5) years old.

(1)Upon completion of a criminal history check on an applicant, the bureau shall issue a report to the state agency.

(A)The state agency shall determine whether the applicant is disqualified from employment under subsection (f) of this section.

If the state agency determines that an applicant is disqualified from employment, then the state agency shall deny employment to the applicant.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 2; 1999, No. 1409, § 10; 2001, No. 995, § 2; 2001, No. 1553, § 34; 2003, No. 1087, § 22; 2003, No. 1380, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 48; 2005, No. 1422, § 1; 2007, No. 991, § 2; 2011, No. 570, §
126; 2013, No. 993, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 367, §§ 27, 28; 2017, No. 664, §§ 21, 22.

21-15-103. Deadline — Scope of check — Report — Notice — Discharge for persons in designated positions.

A state agency shall ensure that any incumbent employee in a designated position has a subsequent central registry check completed within five (5) years of the incumbent employee’s initial central registry check and every five (5) years thereafter.

If the state agency can verify that the applicant has been employed by a state agency in a designated position within sixty (60) days before the application or has lived continuously in the State of Arkansas for the past five (5) years, the bureau shall conduct only a state criminal history check on the applicant.

(A)The state agency shall determine whether the employee is disqualified from employment under subsection (g) of this section.

Continued employment is contingent upon the results of a criminal history check and a central registry check; and

The employee has the right to obtain a copy of his or her:

Capital murder, as prohibited in §5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree and second degree, as prohibited in §§5-10-102 and5-10-103;

Manslaughter, as prohibited in §5-10-104;

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 3; 1999, No. 1409, §§ 11-13; 2001, No. 995, § 3; 2003, No. 482, § 1; 2003, No. 1087, § 23; 2003, No. 1379, § 1; 2003, No. 1473, § 49; 2005, No. 1422, § 1; 2005, No. 1923, § 8; 2007, No. 827, § 180; 2007, No. 991, § 3; 2011, No. 570, §
127; 2017, No. 367, §§ 29, 30; 2017, No. 664, §§ 23, 24.

21-15-104. Waiver of exclusion or discharge requirement for persons in designated positions.

(1)A waiver may be granted upon a preponderance of the evidence that the applicant or employee is rehabilitated such that the public interest is not threatened by the applicant's or employee's employment.

Evidence of rehabilitation may include:

Capital murder, §5-10-101;

Murder in the first degree, §5-10-102;

Murder in the second degree, §5-10-103;

Kidnapping, §5-11-102;

Rape, §5-14-103;

Sexual assault in the first degree, §5-14-124;

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 4; 1999, No. 1409, § 14; 2001, No. 995, § 4; 2003, No. 1087, § 24; 2003, No. 1377, § 1; 2005, No. 1422, § 1; 2007, No. 827, §§ 181, 182; 2007, No. 991, § 4; 2017, No. 367, § 31; 2017, No. 664, § 25.

21-15-105. Confidentiality.

Any information received by a state agency from the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police or from a central registry check under this subchapter shall not be available for examination, and no record, file, or document shall be removed from the custody of the Department of Arkansas State Police.

Any information made available to the affected applicant for employment or the person who is subject to discharge shall be information pertaining to that applicant only.

Rights of privilege and confidentiality established in this section shall not extend to any document created for purposes other than a background check.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 5; 2001, No. 995, § 5; 2015, No. 861, § 8.

21-15-106. Rules — Records.

All state agencies with a designated position or a designated financial or information technology position shall adopt the necessary rules to fully implement the provisions of this subchapter.

Each state agency shall maintain on file, subject to inspection by the Arkansas Crime Information Center, the Identification Bureau of the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Child Maltreatment Central Registry, and the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry evidence that criminal history and central registry checks required by this subchapter have been initiated on all applicants and employees.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 6; 1999, No. 1409, § 15; 2001, No. 995, § 6; 2005, No. 1422, § 2; 2007, No. 991, § 5; 2019, No. 315, § 2340.

21-15-107. Identification Bureau and registries — Duties.

(1)After receipt of a request for a criminal history check, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall make reasonable efforts to respond to requests for state criminal history checks within twenty (20) calendar days and to respond to requests for national criminal history checks within ten (10) calendar days after the receipt of a national criminal history check from the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

After receipt of a request for a central registry check, a registry shall make reasonable efforts to respond to requests within twenty (20) calendar days.

(1)Upon completion of a criminal history check, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall forward all information obtained concerning the applicant or employee to the Arkansas Crime Information Center.

Upon completion of a central registry check, the registry shall forward all information obtained concerning the applicant or employee to the requesting state agency.

The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall maintain a database of the results of criminal history checks on each applicant for employment with and each employee of a state agency in a designated position.

(1)The Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall develop a form to be used for criminal history checks conducted under this subchapter. The form shall require the notarized signature of the person who is the subject of the check.

The Child Maltreatment Central Registry and the Adult and Long-Term Care Facility Resident Maltreatment Central Registry shall work together to develop a form to be used for central registry checks conducted under this subchapter. The form shall require the notarized signature of the person who is the subject of the check.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 7; 2001, No. 995, § 7; 2003, No. 482, § 2; 2005, No. 1422, § 2; 2007, No. 991, § 6.

21-15-108. Exempted employees.

Any person who submits evidence of having maintained employment in the State of Arkansas for the past twelve (12) months and of successfully completing a criminal history check within the last twelve (12) months or in accordance with that person's professional license shall not be required to apply for a criminal history check under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 8.

21-15-109. Immunity.

Individuals and state agencies are immune from suit or liability for damages for acts or omissions, other than malicious acts or omissions, occurring in the performance of duties imposed by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1019, § 9.